Washington statutes.
RCW 38.40.025

Liability of state for federal activities.

Neither the state of Washington, its officers, employees, or agents, nor any member of the militia may be held liable in any civil action for damages arising out of any of the activities of the military forces of the state of Washington while engaged in activities during which the officers, employees, agents, or members are considered employees of the federal government under the federal tort claims act, *26 U.S.C. Sec. 2671 et seq.

[ 1987 c 26 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to 26 U.S.C. appears to be incorrect. Reference to 28 U.S.C. was apparently intended.

Legislative declaration—1987 c 26: "The legislature recognizes that Congress has established comprehensive administrative programs to compensate members of the military forces for injuries they may incur while performing training for national defense." [ 1987 c 26 s 1.]

Severability—1987 c 26: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1987 c 26 s 3.]